Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-2286
Restitution; enforcement; by whom.

An order of restitution may be enforced by a victim named in the order to receive the restitution or the personal representative of the victim's estate in the same manner as a judgment in a civil action. If the victim is deceased and no claim is filed by the personal representative of the estate or if the victim cannot be found, the Attorney General may enforce such order of restitution for the benefit of the Victim's Compensation Fund.

Laws 1986, LB 956, § 7.

Reparations, Nebraska Crime Victim's Reparations Act, see section 81-1841.

Victim's Compensation Fund, see section 81-1835.